Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 11
WRITE-IN CANDIDATES

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980, and this part 11 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 11 prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1992. For a detailed comparison of articles 1 to 13 for 1980 and of this part 11 for 1992, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-4-1101. Write-in candidate affidavit of intent.

A person who wishes to be a write-in candidate for an office in an election shall file an affidavit of intent stating that he or she desires the office and is qualified to assume its duties if elected. A write-in candidate for governor shall designate in the affidavit a write-in candidate for lieutenant governor. A write-in candidate for president of the United States in the general election shall designate in the affidavit a write-in candidate for vice president of the United States and shall include a list of presidential electors endorsed by the electors. The affidavit shall be filed with the secretary of state if it is for a statewide office, a seat in congress, a seat in the general assembly, the office of district attorney, or any other district office of state concern. The affidavit shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder if it is for a county office and with the designated election official if it is for a local office.

No write-in vote for an office in an election shall be counted unless the person for whom the vote was cast filed the affidavit of intent required by subsection (1) of this section within the time prescribed by section 1-4-1102. No write-in vote for a candidate for governor shall be counted unless the person designated as the write-in candidate for lieutenant governor pursuant to subsection (1) of this section also filed an affidavit of intent within the time prescribed by section 1-4-1102.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 695, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1741, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1973, § 12, effective August 3.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1643, § 23, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-1001 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-4-1102. Time of filing affidavit.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the affidavit of intent shall be filed by the close of business on the sixty-seventh day before a primary election and by the close of business on the one hundred tenth day before any other election.

In a nonpartisan election, the affidavit of intent shall be filed by the close of business on the sixty-fourth day before the election. If the election is to be coordinated by the county clerk and recorder, the designated election official shall forward a copy of the affidavit of intent to the coordinated election official.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 696, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1768, § 25, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 835, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1741, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 768, § 31, effective May 20.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1402, § 20, effective June 6; (1) amended, p. 1437, § 20, effective June 6.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1065, § 13, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-1001 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-4-1103. Write-in votes for governor, president.

No write-in vote for governor in a general election will be counted unless it includes a write-in vote for lieutenant governor.

No write-in vote for president in a general election will be counted unless it includes a write-in vote for vice-president.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 696, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 835, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1974, § 13, effective August 3.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1607, § 11, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-1002 as it existed prior to 1992.